Nevada, session 83, AB61.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482.2805 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482.2805 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the Department of Motor Vehicles shall not renew the registration of
a motor vehicle if [a] :
(a) A local authority has filed with the Department of Motor
Vehicles a notice of nonpayment pursuant to NRS 484B.527, [or if
the] unless, at the time for renewal of the registration, the
registered owner of the motor vehicle provides to the Department
of Motor Vehicles a receipt issued by the local authority pursuant
to NRS 482.2807;
(b) The Department of Transportation or a private partner under
a public-private partnership has filed a notice of nonpayment
pursuant to section 42 of the Boulder City Bypass Toll Road
Demonstration Project Act, unless, at the time for renewal of the
registration, the registered owner of the motor vehicle provides to
the Department of Motor Vehicles [a receipt issued by the local
authority pursuant to NRS 482.2807, or] a receipt issued by the
-
*AB61*

– 4 –
Department of Transportation or a private partner under a public-
private partnership [.] entered into pursuant to that Act; or
(c) A public partner or a private partner under a public-private
partnership has filed a notice of nonpayment pursuant to section
25 of this act, unless, at the time for renewal of the registration,
the registered owner of the motor vehicle provides to the
Department of Motor Vehicles a receipt issued by a public partner
or a private partner under a public-private partnership entered
into pursuant to that Act.
2. If the registered owner provides a receipt to the Department
of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subsection 1 and complies with the
other requirements of this chapter, the Department of Motor
Vehicles shall renew the registration of the motor vehicle.
3. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall renew the
registration of a motor vehicle owned by a short-term lessor for
which the Department of Motor Vehicles has received a notice of
nonpayment pursuant to NRS 484B.527 , [or] section 42 of the
Boulder City Bypass Toll Road Demonstration Project Act or
section 25 of this act without requiring the short-term lessor to
provide a receipt pursuant to subsection 1 if the short-term lessor
submits to the Department of Motor Vehicles a certificate issued by
a local authority, the Department of Transportation or a public
partner or private partner under a public-private partnership
pursuant to subsection 4.
4. A local authority, the Department of Transportation or a
public partner or private partner under a public-private partnership
shall, upon request, issue to a short-term lessor a certificate which
requires the Department of Motor Vehicles to renew the registration
of a motor vehicle owned by the short-term lessor without requiring
the short-term lessor to provide a receipt pursuant to subsection 1 if
the short-term lessor provides the local authority, the Department of
Transportation or a public partner or private partner under a public-
private partnership with the name, address and number of the
driver’s license of the short-term lessee who was leasing the vehicle
at the time of the violation.
5. Upon the request of the registered owner of a motor vehicle,
the Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide a copy of the notice
of nonpayment filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles by
[the] :
(a) The local authority pursuant to NRS 484B.527 [or the] ;
(b) The Department of Transportation or a private partner under
a public-private partnership pursuant to section 42 of the Boulder
City Bypass Toll Road Demonstration Project Act [.] ; or
(c) A public partner or private partner under a public-private
partnership pursuant to section 25 of this act.
-
*AB61*

– 5 –
6. If the registration of a motor vehicle that is identified in a
notice of nonpayment filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles
by a local authority pursuant to NRS 484B.527 , [or] the Department
of Transportation or a private partner under a public-private
partnership pursuant to section 42 of the Boulder City Bypass Toll
Road Demonstration Project Act or a public partner or private
partner under a public-private partnership pursuant to section 25
of this act is not renewed for two consecutive periods of
registration, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall delete any
records maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles
concerning that notice.
7. The Department of Motor Vehicles may require [a] :
(a) A local authority to pay a fee for the creation, maintenance
or revision of a record of the Department of Motor Vehicles
concerning a notice of nonpayment filed with the Department of
Motor Vehicles by the local authority pursuant to NRS 484B.527.
[The Department of Motor Vehicles may require the]
(b) The Department of Transportation or a private partner under
a public-private partnership to pay a fee for the creation,
maintenance or revision of a record of the Department of Motor
Vehicles concerning a notice of nonpayment filed with the
Department of Motor Vehicles by the Department of Transportation
or a private partner under a public-private partnership pursuant to
section 42 of the Boulder City Bypass Toll Road Demonstration
Project Act.
(c) A public partner or private partner under a public-private
partnership to pay a fee for the creation, maintenance or revision
of a record of the Department of Motor Vehicles concerning a
notice of nonpayment filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles
by a public partner or private partner under a public-private
partnership pursuant to section 25 of this act.
8. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, by regulation,
establish any fee required by [this] subsection [.] 7. Any fees
collected by the Department pursuant to [this] subsection 7 must be:
(a) Deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor
Vehicle Fund; and
(b) Allocated to the Department to defray the cost of carrying
out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 361.157 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.157 1. When any real estate or portion of real estate
which for any reason is exempt from taxation is leased, loaned or
otherwise made available to and used by a natural person,
association, partnership or corporation in connection with a business
conducted for profit or as a residence, or both, the leasehold interest,
-
*AB61*

– 6 –
possessory interest, beneficial interest or beneficial use of the lessee
or user of the property is subject to taxation to the extent the:
(a) Portion of the property leased or used; and
(b) Percentage of time during the fiscal year that the property is
leased by the lessee or used by the user, in accordance with
NRS 361.2275,
 can be segregated and identified. The taxable value of the interest
or use must be determined in the manner provided in subsection 3 of
NRS 361.227 and in accordance with NRS 361.2275.
2. Subsection 1 does not apply to:
(a) Property located upon a public airport, park, market or
fairground, or any property owned by a public airport, unless the
property owned by the public airport is not located upon the public
airport and the property is leased, loaned or otherwise made
available for purposes other than for the purposes of a public airport,
including, without limitation, residential, commercial or industrial
purposes;
(b) Federal property for which payments are made in lieu of
taxes in amounts equivalent to taxes which might otherwise be
lawfully assessed;
(c) Property of any state-supported educational institution,
except any part of such property located within a tax increment area
created pursuant to NRS 278C.155;
(d) Property leased or otherwise made available to and used by a
natural person, private association, private corporation, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation or a political subdivision
under the provisions of the Taylor Grazing Act or by the United
States Forest Service or the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior;
(e) Property of any Indian or of any Indian tribe, band or
community which is held in trust by the United States or subject to a
restriction against alienation by the United States;
(f) Vending stand locations and facilities operated by persons
who are blind under the auspices of the Bureau of Services to
Persons Who Are Blind or Visually Impaired of the Rehabilitation
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation, whether or not the property is owned by the federal,
state or a local government;
(g) Leases held by a natural person, corporation, association,
municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation or political
subdivision for development of geothermal resources, but only for
resources which have not been put into commercial production;
(h) The use of exempt property that is leased, loaned or made
available to a public officer or employee, incident to or in the course
of public employment;
-
*AB61*

– 7 –
(i) A parsonage owned by a recognized religious society or
corporation when used exclusively as a parsonage;
(j) Property owned by a charitable or religious organization all,
or a portion, of which is made available to and is used as a residence
by a natural person in connection with carrying out the activities of
the organization;
(k) Property owned by a governmental entity and used to
provide shelter at a reduced rate to elderly persons or persons having
low incomes;
(l) The occasional rental of meeting rooms or similar facilities
for periods of less than 30 consecutive days;
(m) The use of exempt property to provide day care for children
if the day care is provided by a nonprofit organization; [or]
(n) Any lease, easement, operating agreement, license, permit or
right of entry for any exempt state property granted by the
Department or the Regional Transportation Commission of
Southern Nevada pursuant to section 45 of the Boulder City Bypass
Toll Road Demonstration Project Act [.] ; or
(o) Any lease, easement, operating agreement, license, permit
or right of entry for any exempt state property granted by the
Department, the Regional Transportation Commission of Washoe
County or a local government within Washoe County pursuant to
section 28 of this act.
3. Taxes must be assessed to lessees or users of exempt real
estate and collected in the same manner as taxes assessed to owners
of other real estate, except that taxes due under this section do not
become a lien against the property. When due, the taxes constitute a
debt due from the lessee or user to the county for which the taxes
were assessed and, if unpaid, are recoverable by the county in the
proper court of the county.
Sec. 3. Sections 3 to 33, inclusive, of this act may be cited as
the La Posada Drive to USA Parkway Connection Toll Road
Demonstration Project Act. This act shall only apply to the La
Posada Drive to USA Parkway Connection Toll Road
Demonstration Project Act and not to any other project within this
State.
Sec. 4. As used in this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 5 to 16, inclusive,
of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. “Authorized emergency vehicle” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 484A.020.
Sec. 6. “Commission” means the Regional Transportation
Commission of Washoe County.
Sec. 7. “Concession” means any lease, ground lease, franchise,
easement, permit, right of entry, operating agreement or other
-
*AB61*

– 8 –
binding agreement transferring rights for the use or control, in whole
or in part, of the demonstration project by a public partner to a
private partner.
Sec. 8. “Demonstration project” means the toll road
demonstration project established by a public partner pursuant to
section 17 of this act.
Sec. 9. “Local government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 338.010.
Sec. 10. “Motor vehicle” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 484A.130.
Sec. 11. “Private partner” means a person with whom a public
partner enters into a public-private partnership.
Sec. 12. “Public partner” means:
1. The Commission; or
2. A local government within Washoe County,
 if the entity has entered into a public-private partnership with a
private partner pursuant to section 19 of this act.
Sec. 13. “Public-private partnership” means a contract entered
into by a public partner and a private partner under which the
private partner:
1. Assists the public partner in defining a potential project
concerning the demonstration project and negotiates terms for
potentially carrying out the planning, design, financing,
construction, improvement, maintenance or operation of or
acquisition of rights-of-way for, or any combination thereof, the
demonstration project or any portion thereof; or
2. Assumes responsibility for planning, designing, financing,
constructing, improving, maintaining, operating or acquiring rights-
of-way for the demonstration project or any portion thereof.
Sec. 14. “Registered owner” means a person whose name
appears in the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles as the
person to whom a motor vehicle is registered.
Sec. 15. “Toll road” means a highway and appurtenant
facilities for which a user must pay a user fee as a condition of use.
Sec. 16. “User fee” means a toll, fee, fare or other similar
charge, including, without limitation, any incidental, account
maintenance, administrative, credit card or video tolling fee or
charge authorized by the Commission or a public-private
partnership and imposed on a person for the use of a toll road.
Sec. 17. 1. The Commission or any local government within
Washoe County may establish a toll road demonstration project in
connection with the toll road connecting the eastern terminus of La
Posada Drive within the City of Sparks to the area in the vicinity of
State Route 439 at its intersection with U.S. Interstate Highway 80
near Mile Marker 33 and may:
-
*AB61*

– 9 –
(a) Include, without limitation, highways, roads, bridges, on-
ramps, off-ramps, direct connectors to or from other highways or
arterials, tunnels, connectors to an airport, pavement, shoulders,
structures, culverts, curbs, toll gantries and systems, drains, rights-
of-way, buildings, communication facilities, equipment
appurtenances, lighting, signage, service centers, operations centers,
services, personal property and works incidental to, related to or
desirable for highway design, construction, improvement,
maintenance or operation required, laid out, constructed, improved,
maintained or operated for highway purposes.
(b) Include any appurtenant facilities and facilities necessary for
financing, connectivity, operations, maintenance, mobility or safety
of the demonstration project, which may include tolled and
nontolled elements and on- and off-site facilities.
(c) Be developed in one or more phases, through one or more
solicitations and with one or more private partners.
2. The Commission or a local government within Washoe
County may perform such tasks as are necessary and appropriate to
plan, design, finance, construct, improve, maintain, operate and
acquire rights-of-way for the demonstration project, including,
without limitation:
(a) Plan, design, finance, construct, maintain, operate and make
such other improvements to existing highways as may be necessary
and appropriate to accommodate, develop and own the
demonstration project.
(b) Determine the allowable uses of and the goals, standards,
specifications and criteria of the demonstration project.
(c) Enter into agreements with any other political subdivision of
this State, another state or the Federal Government for planning,
designing, financing, constructing, improving, maintaining,
operating and acquiring rights-of-way for the demonstration project.
(d) Enter into public-private partnerships for planning,
designing, financing, constructing, improving, maintaining,
operating and acquiring rights-of-way for the demonstration project.
(e) Retain legal, financial, technical and other consultants to
assist the public partner concerning the demonstration project.
(f) Secure financial and other assistance for planning, designing,
financing, constructing, improving, maintaining, operating and
acquiring rights-of-way for the demonstration project.
(g) Apply for, accept and expend money from any lawful
source, including, without limitation, any public or private funding,
loan, grant, line of credit, loan guarantee, credit instrument, private
activity bond allocations, credit assistance from the Federal
Government or other type of assistance that is available to carry out
the demonstration project.
-
*AB61*

– 10 –
(h) Accept from any source any grant, donation, gift or other
form of conveyance of land, money, other real or personal property
or other thing of value made to the public partner to carry out the
demonstration project.
(i) Pay any compensation to which a private partner is entitled,
pursuant to the terms of a public-private partnership, upon the
termination of the public-private partnership.
(j) Enter into a bond indenture, loan agreement, interest rate
swap, financing agreement, security agreement, pledge agreement,
credit facility, trust agreement or other financial agreement in
connection with the financing of the demonstration project.
3. The demonstration project, whether planned, designed,
financed, constructed, improved, maintained or operated by the
Commission, a local government within Washoe County, or one or
more private partners, must be and remain:
(a) A public highway;
(b) A public use;
(c) A public facility; and
(d) Owned by the Commission or a local government within
Washoe County.
4. Before construction of the demonstration project begins,
State Route 445 and U.S. Interstate Highway 80 shall be deemed
alternate routes to the toll road which do not require a user fee and
which accommodate all classes of vehicles. The Commission or any
government entity within this State may establish one or more
additional alternate routes to the toll road which do not require a
user fee and which can accommodate all classes of vehicles that
may be accommodated on State Route 445 and U.S. Interstate
Highway 80 as of the date that construction of the demonstration
project begins.
Sec. 18. The Commission and the Department of
Transportation shall not:
1. Request the Federal Government to prohibit or otherwise
seek to prohibit the use on State Route 445 and U.S. Interstate
Highway 80 of any classes of vehicles which are authorized on
those highways as of the effective date of this section; and
2. Exercise any authority delegated to the Commission or the
Department to prohibit the use on State Route 445 and U.S.
Interstate Highway 80 of any classes of vehicles which are
authorized on those highways as of the effective date of this section.
Sec. 19. 1. The Commission or a local government within
Washoe County may enter into a public-private partnership with one
or more private partners for planning, designing, financing,
constructing, improving, maintaining, operating or acquiring rights-
of-way for the demonstration project. A public-private partnership
-
*AB61*

– 11 –
entered into pursuant to this section may include, without limitation,
a concession and must be awarded through one or more solicitations
that must include, without limitation, some or all of the requests for
qualifications, short-listing of qualified proposers, requests for
proposals, negotiations and best and final offers.
2. For any solicitation in which the Commission or the local
government, as applicable, issues a request for qualifications,
request for proposals or similar solicitation for a public-private
partnership, the Commission or the local government may determine
which factors it will consider and the relative weight of those factors
in the evaluation process for the demonstration project to obtain the
best value for the Commission or the local government.
3. Each request for proposals issued for the demonstration
project must require each person submitting a proposal to include
with the proposal an executive summary. The executive summary
must address the major elements of the proposal but must not
include the financial terms of the proposal, the financing plan or
other confidential or proprietary information or trade secrets that the
person submitting the proposal intends to be exempt from
disclosure.
4. The executive summary for each proposal must be released
to the public by the Commission or the local government, as
applicable.
5. Except as otherwise expressly authorized in this act, the
provisions of chapter 338 of NRS shall apply to the demonstration
project.
6. If the Commission or the local government, as applicable, is
unable to negotiate a public-private partnership with the applicant
whose proposal appeared to have the best value, upon such terms
and conditions that the Commission or the local government
determines to be in the best interest of the public, the Commission
or the local government may suspend or terminate negotiations with
that applicant. The Commission or the local government may then
undertake negotiations with the next highest-rated applicant in
sequence until a public-private partnership is entered into or a
determination is made by the Commission or the local government
to reject all applicants that submitted proposals.
7. After the award and execution of a public-private
partnership, a public partner shall make available to the applicants
and the public the results of the evaluations of proposals and the
final rankings of the applicants.
8. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, to maximize
competition and to obtain the best value for the public, no part of a
proposal other than the executive summary may be released or
disclosed by the Commission or the local government, as applicable,
-
*AB61*

– 12 –
before the award and execution of the public-private partnership and
the conclusion of any specified period to protest or otherwise
challenge the award, except pursuant to an administrative or judicial
order requiring release or disclosure of any part of the proposal.
Sec. 20. 1. To be eligible as a private partner in connection
with a public-private partnership, a private partner must:
(a) Obtain a performance bond, payment bond, letter of credit,
parent guarantee or other security acceptable to the Commission or
the local government, or any combination thereof, which the
Commission or the local government determines is adequate to:
(1) Protect the interests of this State and its political
subdivisions; and
(2) Ensure completion of the demonstration project without
this State or its political subdivisions being liable for any of the
direct costs of the demonstration project;
(b) Obtain insurance covering general liability and liability for
errors and omissions, in amounts determined by the Commission or
the local government;
(c) Not have been found liable for breach of contract with
respect to a previous project with the Commission or any local
government within Washoe County, other than a breach for
legitimate cause during the 5 years immediately preceding the
commencement of the solicitation of the public-private partnership;
and
(d) Not have been disqualified from being awarded a contract
pursuant to NRS 338.017, 338.13895 or 338.1475.
2. A private partner is not required to hold the licenses and
certifications required to undertake the work for the demonstration
project as a condition of eligibility to be a private partner but must
ensure that any work which requires a license or certification is
performed by persons that possess the required licenses and
certifications.
Sec. 21. Information obtained by or disclosed to the
Commission or a local government within Washoe County during
the procurement or negotiation of a public-private partnership may
be kept confidential until the public-private partnership is executed,
except that the Commission or the local government may exempt
from release any proprietary information obtained by or disclosed to
the Commission or the local government during the procurement or
negotiation.
Sec. 22. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a public-private
partnership may be for a term of not more than 40 years after the
opening of the demonstration project to the public and the
commencement of its full operations and collection of revenue.
-
*AB61*

– 13 –
2. A public-private partnership may be extended:
(a) As a result of an event in the nature of force majeure;
(b) As a means to compensate the private partner for events set
forth in the public-private partnership that entitle the private partner
to compensation; or
(c) For additional terms upon the mutual agreement of the
private partner and the public partner.
Sec. 23. 1. A public-private partnership entered into
pursuant to this act may include provisions that:
(a) Authorize a public partner and a private partner to charge,
collect, use, enforce and retain user fees, including, without
limitation, provisions that:
(1) Specify the technology to be used in the demonstration
project;
(2) Establish circumstances under which a public partner
may receive the revenues or a share of the revenues from such user
fees;
(3) State that the user fees may be collected directly by a
public partner, a private partner or by a third party engaged for that
purpose;
(4) Prescribe a formula, indexation or mechanism for the
adjustment of user fees during the term of the public-private
partnership;
(5) Allow a variety of strategies to be employed to manage
traffic on the demonstration project that a public partner determines
are appropriate based on the specific circumstances of the
demonstration project; and
(6) Govern the enforcement of user fees, including, without
limitation, provisions for the use of cameras or other mechanisms to
ensure that users have paid user fees which are due and provisions
that allow a public partner and private partner to request information
from relevant databases, including, without limitation, databases of
the Department of Motor Vehicles, pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 481.063, for enforcement purposes. The Commission may
impose a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 per violation for
misuse of the data contained in such databases, including, without
limitation, negligence in securing the data properly. Any civil
penalty collected pursuant to this subparagraph must be deposited in
the State General Fund.
(b) Allow for payments to be made by a public partner to a
private partner, including, without limitation, periodic payments,
construction payments, payments for attaining milestones, progress
payments, payments based on availability or other performance-
based payments, payments relating to events for which the public-
private partnership requires payment of compensation and payments
-
*AB61*

– 14 –
relating to or arising out of the termination of the public-private
partnership.
(c) Allow a public partner to accept payments of money from,
and share revenues with, the private partner. The public partner shall
deposit such money in the State Highway Fund.
(d) Address the manner in which a public partner and a private
partner will share management of the risks of the demonstration
project.
(e) Specify the manner in which a public partner and a private
partner will share the costs of any development of the demonstration
project.
(f) Allocate financial responsibility for any costs that exceed the
amount specified in the public-private partnership.
(g) Establish applicable liquidated or stipulated damages to be
assessed for nonperformance by the private partner.
(h) Establish performance measurements, or incentives, or both.
(i) Address the acquisition of rights-of-way and other property
interests that may be required for the demonstration project,
including, without limitation, provisions that address the exercise of
eminent domain by a public partner in the manner authorized
pursuant to NRS 277A.250 and chapter 37 of NRS.
(j) Establish recordkeeping, accounting and auditing standards
to be used for the demonstration project.
(k) Upon termination of the public-private partnership, address
responsibility for repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction or renovations
that are required for the demonstration project to meet all applicable
standards set forth in the public-private partnership upon reversion
of the demonstration project to a public partner.
(l) Provide for security and law enforcement.
(m) Identify any specifications of a public partner that must be
satisfied, including, without limitation, provisions allowing the
private partner to request and receive authorization to deviate from
the specifications on making a showing satisfactory to the public
partner.
(n) Specify remedies available and procedures for dispute
resolution, including, without limitation, the right of the private
partner to institute legal proceedings to obtain an enforceable
judgment or award against a public partner in the event of a default
by the public partner and procedures for the use of dispute review
boards, mediation, facilitated negotiation, nonbinding and binding
arbitration and other alternative dispute resolution procedures.
(o) Specify the manner in which a public partner and a private
partner will share the costs of ongoing maintenance of the
demonstration project.
-
*AB61*

– 15 –
2. A public-private partnership entered into pursuant to this act
must contain a provision by which a private partner expressly agrees
to be barred from seeking injunctive or other equitable relief to
delay, prevent or otherwise hinder the public partner from
developing or constructing a facility which was planned at the time
the public-private partnership was executed and which may impact
the revenue that the private partner derives from the demonstration
project developed under the public-private partnership. A public-
private partnership may provide for reasonable compensation to a
private partner for the adverse effect on revenue from the
demonstration project developed under the public-private
partnership resulting from the development or construction of
another facility by a public partner.
Sec. 24. 1. If a public partner enters into a public-private
partnership pursuant to this act, the public partner:
(a) Shall adopt, establish or include in the public-private
partnership a schedule of user fees or a methodology for
establishing the user fees that may be charged by the public partner
or a private partner for the use of the demonstration project, which
may include, without limitation, provisions for adjusting the user
fees based on the types of motor vehicle, time of day, traffic
conditions or other factors determined necessary by the public
partner to implement, finance or improve the performance of the
demonstration project. A schedule of user fees or methodology for
establishing user fees to be included in the public-private
partnership must be adopted or established by the public partner at a
public hearing held in compliance with chapter 241 of NRS.
(b) Shall, consistent with this act, establish or provide in the
public-private partnership for the establishment of administrative
fines, late charges and other penalties for any person who violates
any regulation or rule governing the use of the demonstration
project or who fails to pay a user fee.
(c) In addition to the exemptions provided in subsection 2, may
establish or provide in the public-private partnership for exemptions
from the payment of a user fee.
(d) Shall adopt a plan for measuring the performance of the
private partner and, in the event of any unexcused failure by the
private partner to meet such performance measurements, provide for
the rights and remedies of the public partner.
2. The following motor vehicles are exempt from any user fee
established by a public partner:
(a) A vehicle owned or operated by this State or any of its
political subdivisions.
(b) A transit bus or vanpool vehicle owned or operated by an
agency of the United States, to the extent that such vehicles are
-
*AB61*

– 16 –
exempted pursuant to an agreement between the agency or political
subdivision and the public partner or a private partner.
(c) An authorized emergency vehicle if the person operating it
is:
(1) Responding to an emergency and its emergency lights are
in use; or
(2) Enforcing traffic laws.
(d) A vehicle used to provide maintenance of the demonstration
project.
(e) A vehicle that is exempt pursuant to the terms of a public-
private partnership.
3. Not less frequently than once each calendar year, a public
partner shall review any fee schedule established pursuant to this
section and any adjustments to the fee schedule made by a public
partner or a private partner to determine whether the user fees
effectively manage travel times, speed and reliability with regard to
the demonstration project. The public partner shall review and, if
applicable, make any necessary adjustments at a public hearing held
in compliance with chapter 241 of NRS.
4. A public partner or a private partner may use any method it
determines appropriate to collect a user fee, including, without
limitation, the issuance of invoices, prepayment requirements and
the use of an electronic, video or automated collection system. An
electronic, video or automated collection system may be used to
verify payment or to charge the user a fee to the:
(a) Account of a person whose vehicle is equipped with a
transponder approved by the public partner or other automated
payment technology approved by the public partner;
(b) Account of a person who otherwise registers to use the
demonstration project in accordance with the policies and
procedures established by the public partner or set forth in the
public-private partnership; or
(c) Registered owner.
5. The name, address, other personal identifying information
and trip data of a user is confidential, and a public partner, a private
partner, consultant, contractor or representative thereof shall not
release, sell or distribute such information without the express
written consent of the user, except that a public partner or a private
partner may release such information:
(a) As is necessary to collect a user fee and enforce any penalty
for a violation of this act or any policies and procedures established
pursuant thereto or set forth in the public-private partnership; and
(b) To a law enforcement agency pursuant to a subpoena.
-
*AB61*

– 17 –
6. A public partner or a private partner may solicit and contract
with any person to provide services relating to the collection of a
user fee.
7. A public partner shall establish a privacy policy regarding
the collection and use of personal identifying information pursuant
to this section. The policy must include, without limitation,
provisions requiring that:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), any personal
identifying information used to collect and enforce user fees be
destroyed not later than 30 days after the person has paid the user
fee and any administrative fines, late fees or other penalties and
charges imposed;
(b) Any personal identifying information collected for the
establishment of an account for the use of an automated collection
system be:
(1) Stored longer than 30 days only if the information is
required to perform account functions, including, without limitation,
billing and other activities directly related to the use of the account;
and
(2) Destroyed within 30 days after receiving written notice
that the person who established the account wants to close the
account; and
(c) Each person establishing an account for use in an automated
collection system be provided a copy, in a clear and conspicuous
manner, of the privacy policy required by this subsection and all
other applicable privacy laws.
Sec. 25. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
registered owner who fails to pay a user fee is subject to an
administrative fine for nonpayment and is liable to a public partner
or a private partner for the payment of the user fee, the
administrative fine and any additional charges or penalties
prescribed by the public partner or set forth in a public-private
partnership.
2. If a driver or registered owner fails to pay a user fee, a
public partner or private partner shall provide notice of nonpayment
to the registered owner. The notice must describe the claimed
nonpayment and the amount due, including any additional charges,
administrative fines or penalties, and explaining that the registered
owner must, within 30 days after receiving the notice, pay the full
amount due or contest the claim in the manner described in the
notice. A registered owner who does not pay the full amount due or
contest the claim within 30 days after receiving the notice may not
challenge the claim in a proceeding or action brought by a public
partner or a private partner.
-
*AB61*

– 18 –
3. A short-term lessor of a motor vehicle that is the registered
owner is not liable to a public partner or a private partner for any
failure to pay a user fee arising out of the use of a rented motor
vehicle during any period in which the motor vehicle is not in the
possession of the lessor if, within 45 days after receiving the written
notice from the public partner or private partner, the lessor provides
to the public partner or private partner the name, address, driver’s
license number and other identifying information of the person to
whom the motor vehicle was rented at the time of the use of the
demonstration project. If the lessor provides such information, the
person to whom the motor vehicle was rented at the time of the use
of the demonstration project is liable for the user fee or
administrative fee, or both, and any late charges or other penalties or
charges resulting from the failure to pay the user fee.
4. A public partner or a private partner may use a photo-
monitoring, video, image capture or other automated or technology-
based enforcement and collections system to detect the failure of a
motor vehicle to register the payment of the required user fee, to
detect the failure of the driver or registered owner to pay a user fee
or to verify and assess the payment of a user fee. The data, including
photographs, images, videotapes and other vehicle and owner
information generated and obtained by the system may be used to
establish the nonpayment of the user fee and to enforce collection of
the user fee and any administrative fines, late charges and other
penalties or charges imposed pursuant to a public-private
partnership. The public partner or private partner shall not use the
information for any other purpose.
5. If the registered owner fails to respond to the notice
described in subsection 2, the public partner or private partner may
file a notice of nonpayment with the Department of Motor Vehicles.
The notice must include:
(a) The place, time and date of the use of the demonstration
project which, through nonpayment of user fees, administrative fees,
late charges or other penalties or charges, constitutes a violation;
(b) The number of the license plate and the make and model
year of the motor vehicle; and
(c) The total amount owed to the public partner or private
partner for the violation.
6. Upon receipt of the notice described in subsection 5, the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall place a hold on the renewal of
the registration of the motor vehicle described in the notice pursuant
to the provisions of NRS 482.2805.
7. In addition to any administrative fine, late charge or other
penalty or charge for nonpayment of a user fee established pursuant
to a public-private partnership which is payable to a public partner
-
*AB61*

– 19 –
or a private partner, the Department of Motor Vehicles may impose
an additional administrative fee of not more than $15 upon any
person who applies for the renewal of the registration of a motor
vehicle subject to a hold pursuant to this section.
8. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall work cooperatively
with a public partner and any private partner to establish a timely
and efficient manner for providing the motor vehicle registration of
the registered owner, pursuant to the provisions of NRS 481.063, to
the public partner and any private partner for the purposes of
collecting and enforcing any user fees and administrative fines, late
charges and other penalties imposed pursuant to this act.
Sec. 26. 1. All money that is received and that is to be
retained by a public partner pursuant to a public-private partnership
in connection with the demonstration project that is derived from the
imposition of any charge with respect to the operation of any motor
vehicle upon any public highway in this State must be deposited in
the State Highway Fund and, except for costs of administration,
must be used exclusively for the design, financing, construction,
maintenance, operation and repair of the public highways of this
State. The money must first be used to defray the obligations of a
public partner under the public-private partnership, including,
without limitation, the costs of administration, design, financing,
construction, maintenance, operation and repair of the
demonstration project.
2. Any other money received by a public partner pursuant to
this act or any policies or procedures established by a public partner
must be deposited in the State Highway Fund and accounted for
separately. The interest and income on the money in the account,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
account. The money in the account may be used for:
(a) The payment of the costs of planning, designing, financing,
constructing, improving, maintaining, operating or acquiring rights-
of-way for the demonstration project;
(b) The payment of the costs of administering the demonstration
project and enforcing the collection of user fees;
(c) Satisfying of any obligations of a public partner pursuant to a
public-private partnership; and
(d) The costs of administration, construction, maintenance and
repair of the public highways located in Washoe County.
Sec. 27. 1. The demonstration project and any property
improvement determined by a public partner to be necessary or
desirable therefor may, as determined by the public partner be
financed:
(a) By the private partner using its own funds or obtaining funds
in any lawful manner for that entity.
-
*AB61*

– 20 –
(b) By the issuance of revenue bonds or notes of the public
partner which are payable from and secured by:
(1) Revenues from the demonstration project, including,
without limitation, user fees and payments established, due and
collected pursuant to this act, other than subsection 7 of section 25
of this act;
(2) Payments from a public partner to a private partner
pursuant to a public-private partnership;
(3) Money that is received by a public partner as described in
section 26 of this act;
(4) Guarantees or other forms of financial assistance from the
private partner or any other person;
(5) Any grants, donations or other sources of funding
mentioned in paragraph (f), (g), or (h) of subsection 2 of section 17
of this act, if the use of the money to pay and secure the payment of
the principal of and interest on those bonds or notes is consistent
with and not prohibited by the instrument, law or regulation under
which the money is received;
(6) Interest or other gain accruing on any of the money
deposited in the State Highway Fund pursuant to this act; and
(7) Any combination thereof,
 as described in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the
bonds or notes.
(c) By the issuance of revenue bonds or notes of a public
partner, to finance the demonstration project directly or by making a
loan to the private partner, pursuant to a financing agreement
entered into between the public partner and the private partner to
secure the bonds or notes and provide for their payment.
(d) By the issuance of private activity bonds or notes of a public
partner or other eligible issuer, to finance the demonstration project
directly or by making a loan to the private partner, pursuant to a
financing agreement entered into between the public partner and the
private partner for the purpose of securing the bonds or notes and
providing for their payment.
(e) By any loan, grant, line of credit, loan guarantee, credit
instrument, private activity bond allocation, credit assistance from
the Federal Government or other type of assistance that is available
to carry out the demonstration project.
(f) With any grant, donation, gift or other form of conveyance of
land, money or other real or personal property or other thing of
value made to a public partner to carry out the demonstration
project.
(g) With legally available money from any other source,
including a source described in paragraph (f), (g) or (h) of
subsection 2 of section 17 of this act, or from user fees.
-
*AB61*

– 21 –
(h) By any combination of paragraphs (a) to (g), inclusive.
2. Any bonds or notes issued pursuant to paragraph (b), (c) or
(d) of subsection 1:
(a) May have a maturity of up to 40 years from the date of
issuance.
(b) Are special, limited obligations of the public partner that are,
except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, payable solely
from the revenues specifically pledged to the payment of those
obligations, as specified in the resolution for the issuance of bonds
or notes, and shall never be a debt of the State under Section 3 of
Article 9 of the Constitution of the State of Nevada.
3. If so determined by the public partner, any bonds or notes
issued as described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 may also be
payable from and secured by taxes which are credited to the State
Highway Fund and which would not cause the bonds or notes to
create a public debt under the provisions of Section 3 of Article 9 of
the Nevada Constitution. In addition, the public partner may pledge
those taxes to and use those taxes for the payment of any of its
obligations under a public-private partnership.
4. Any bonds or notes issued pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d)
of subsection 1 may also be payable from and secured by payments
made by and property of and other security provided by the private
partner, including, without limitation, any payments made to the
private partner by the public partner pursuant to the public-private
partnership.
Sec. 28. 1. A public partner may acquire, condemn or hold
real property and related appurtenances under fee title, lease,
easement, dedication or license for the demonstration project. A
public partner may grant to a private partner a lease, easement,
operating agreement, license, permit or right of entry for such real
property and related appurtenances, and such grant and use shall be
deemed for all purposes:
(a) A public use;
(b) A public facility; and
(c) A public highway.
2. The real property and related appurtenances, or the use
thereof, that are granted by a public partner to the private partner
shall be exempt from all real property and ad valorem taxes.
3. The Department of Transportation shall assist a public
partner in any way necessary for the public partner to carry out the
provisions of this section, including, without limitation, granting to
the public partner or a private partner a lease, easement, operating
agreement, license, permit or right of entry.
Sec. 29. Notwithstanding any specific statute to the contrary, a
private partner is exempt from any assessment on property:
-
*AB61*

– 22 –
1. Which the Department of Transportation or a public partner
owns or acquires or in which the Department or a public partner has
a possessory interest;
2. Which the Department or a public partner provides to the
private partner pursuant to a public-private partnership; and
3. On which the demonstration project is located.
Sec. 30. 1. A private partner who enters into a contract for
construction work pursuant to a public-private partnership shall:
(a) Award contracts using competitive bidding in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 338 of NRS, and solely for the
purposes of those provisions regarding competitive bidding, the
demonstration project shall be deemed to be a public work and
the private partner shall be deemed to be a public body awarding the
contracts for the demonstration project; and
(b) Pay the prevailing wage required pursuant to NRS 338.013
to 338.090, inclusive, and solely for the purposes of those
provisions, the demonstration project shall be deemed to be a public
work and the public partner shall be deemed to be a party to the
contract and to be the public body advertising for bids for the
demonstration project and awarding the construction contract for
the demonstration project.
2. Nothing in this section requires a public partner to use
competitive bidding in accordance with the provisions of chapter
338 of NRS to award a public-private partnership to a private
partner.
Sec. 31. 1. In addition to complying with the provisions of
section 30 of this act, a private partner who enters into a contract for
construction work pursuant to a public-private partnership shall:
(a) Advertise for at least 7 calendar days for bids on each
contract for the performance of any portion of the construction work
for the public-private partnership;
(b) At least 2 business days before the first day of that
advertisement, provide notice of that advertisement to the
Commission, the Board of County Commissioners of Washoe
County, the City Council of the City of Reno and the City Council
of the City of Sparks;
(c) Make available to all prospective bidders on the contract a
written set of plans and specifications for the pertinent work; and
(d) Provide public notice of the name and address of each person
who submits a bid on the contract.
2. If the Commission, the Board of County Commissioners of
Washoe County, the City Council of the City of Reno and the City
Council of the City of Sparks receive a notice of an advertisement
for bids pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the Commission,
Board or City Council:
-
*AB61*

– 23 –
(a) Shall, upon such receipt, post notice of the advertisement on
an Internet website maintained by the Commission, County or City;
and
(b) May otherwise provide notice of the advertisement to local
trade organizations and the general public.
3. A public partner shall ensure that the private partner
complies with the provisions of subsection 1.
Sec. 32. 1. A public partner may include authority in a
public-private partnership or otherwise authorize a private partner to
remove any encroachments or relocate any utility from the right-of-
way of the demonstration project. The public partner may
incorporate the costs of such removal or relocation into the public-
private partnership.
2. A utility may not be required to pay any cost related to
removing or relocating any property of the utility pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 33. To the extent practicable, the provisions of this act are
intended to supplement other statutory provisions governing the
administration of highways in this State, and such other provisions
must be given effect to the extent that those provisions do not
conflict with the provisions of this act. If there is a conflict between
such other provisions and the provisions of this act, the provisions
of this act control.
Sec. 34. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*AB61*